Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1116.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 778. (1) The office shall initiate an investigation of an apparent or suspected rights violations violation in a timely and efficient manner. Subject to delays involving pending action by external agencies as described in subsection (5), the office shall complete the investigation not later than 90 days after it receives the the submission of a rights complaint. Investigation shall An investigation must be initiated immediately after the submission of a rights complaint in cases involving alleged abuse, neglect, serious injury, or death of a recipient. involving an apparent or suspected rights violation.As used in this subsection, "immediately" means not later than 24 hours. (2) Investigation The office shall accurately record investigation activities for each rights complaint. shall be accurately recorded by the office. (3) The office shall determine whether a right was violated by using the preponderance of the evidence as its standard of proof. (4) The office shall issue a written status report every 30 calendar days during the course of the investigation. The written status report shall must be submitted to the complainant, the respondent, and the responsible mental health agency. A written status report shall must include all of the following: (a) Statement of the allegations. (b) Statement of the issues involved. (c) Citations to relevant provisions of this act, rules, policies, and guidelines. (d) Investigative progress to date. (e) Expected date for completion of the investigation. (5) Upon On completion of the investigation, the office shall submit a written investigative report to the respondent and to the responsible mental health agency. Issuance of the written investigative report may be delayed pending completion of investigations that involve external agencies, including law enforcement agencies and the department of social services. The written investigative report shall must include all of the following: (a) Statement of the allegations. (b) Statement of the issues involved. (c) Citations to relevant provisions of this act, rules, policies, and guidelines. (d) Investigative findings. (e) Conclusions. (f) Recommendations, if any. (6) A The office may reopen or reinvestigate a rights investigation may be reopened or reinvestigated by the office if there is new evidence that was not presented at the time of the initial investigation.